West Virginia, session 2026, HB4274.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of West Virginia: ARTICLE 9. Authorization for miscellaneous boards and agencies to promulgate legislative rules. §64- 9 - 1. Board of Architects. The legislative rule filed in the State Register on July 24, 2025, authorized under the authority of §30-12-3 of this code, modified by the Board of Architects to meet the objections of the Legislative Rule-Making Review Committee and refiled in the State Register on October 8, 2025, relating to the Board of Architects (fees for registration of architects, 2 CSR 03), is authorized.